Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
County and Municipal Bonds for Pollution Control

§ 49-17-101.
Definitions.

Whenever used in Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context, the following terms, whether used in the singular or plural, shall be given the following meanings:

“Bonds” shall include notes, bonds and other obligations authorized to be issued under Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123.

“Governing board” shall mean the governing bodies of the several counties and incorporated municipalities of the state as now or hereafter constituted; and in the event that any pollution control facilities shall be located in more than one (1) county, the term “governing board” shall also relate to the governing bodies of the several counties wherein such pollution control facilities shall be located.

“Municipality” shall mean a county or incorporated municipality of this state.

“Pollution control facilities” shall mean any facilities to be located in the municipality which are designed and used for the elimination, mitigation or prevention of air or water pollution, and shall include all facilities and equipment designed and used to collect, treat and thereafter dispose of all effluents and waste of any sort originating in or about or resulting from conduct of any industrial enterprise. Pollution control facilities may include facilities designed both for water and air pollution. Pollution control facilities may be constructed as part of, and may include facilities also designed for the recovery of chemicals or to serve some other purpose, but which also contribute to the elimination, mitigation or prevention of air or water pollution. Pollution control facilities financed pursuant to Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 by a county or an incorporated municipality shall not be a part of such county’s or municipality’s municipal water or sewer system.

“Industry” shall mean any person, firm or corporation operating any enterprise or facility for the manufacturing, processing, generation, assembling, distributing, shipping or rendering of any type of energy, product, or public utility services from which operation conditions result which would, unless eliminated, mitigated or prevented, result in pollution of the atmosphere or waters situated in or abutting this state.

“Pollution authority” shall mean the Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Commission as established by Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43, as the same may be amended from time to time.

“Lease/sale” shall mean any agreement without limitation whereby a county or incorporated municipality shall lease and/or convey title to pollution control facilities to an industry, made by and between the governing board and such industry by which such industry agrees to pay to (and to secure if so required) the county or the incorporated municipality, as the case may be, or to any assignee thereof, the sums required to meet the payment of the principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, on any bonds, and/or the expenses, if any, of operation by such municipality or county.

“Board” shall mean the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-103.
General powers of local governments.

Upon compliance with procedures prescribed herein, and subject to the provisions hereinafter stated in Sections 49-17-105 through 49-17-123, any municipality is hereby authorized and empowered:

To acquire, purchase, construct, operate, maintain and replace pollution control facilities;

To enlarge, expand and improve existing pollution control facilities;

To issue bonds for the purpose of defraying the cost of facilities contemplated by subsections (a) and (b) above;

To enter into agreements with any industry situated in the municipality to construct, operate, maintain, repair and replace said facilities;

To enter into a lease/sale with an industry for the lease and/or sale of such facilities to such industry;

To accept any state or federal grant that may be available to defray any part of the cost of such facilities. Provided, however, the agreements contemplated by subsections (d) and (e) above shall contain terms and conditions under which the industry shall pay to the municipality, or trustee, if any, for the bonds contemplated by subsection (c) above, such sums of money and at such periods as will equal the aggregate of principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, due on the bonds and also the costs, if any, to the municipality of operating, maintaining, insuring, repairing and replacing such facilities, or portions thereof, including a reasonable amount for reserves. Provided, further, any agreement contemplated by subsection (e) above shall further contain terms and conditions pursuant to which the said facilities shall be conveyed to the industry.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-105.
General provisions as to bonds.

All bonds issued by a municipality under authority of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 shall be limited obligations of such municipality. The principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, shall be payable solely out of the moneys to be derived by the municipality pursuant to the agreements specified in subsections (d) and (e) of Section 49-17-103. Bonds and interest coupons issued under authority of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 shall never constitute an indebtedness of such municipality within the meaning of any state constitutional provision or statutory limitation and shall never constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the municipality, or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers, and such fact shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond. Such bonds may be executed and delivered at any time as a single issue or from time to time as several issues, may be in such form and denominations, may be of such tenor, may be in registered or bearer form either as to principal or interest or both, may be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their date, may be subject to such terms of redemption, may be payable at such place or places, may bear interest at such rate or rates as the governing board and the industry shall agree upon, provided that the bonds of any issue shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103; and may contain such other provisions not inconsistent herewith, as the municipality may determine, all of which shall be provided in the proceedings authorizing the bonds. Any bonds issued under the authority of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 may be sold at public or private sale at such price and in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the governing board to be most advantageous, and the governing board may pay, as a part of the cost of acquiring any pollution control facility, and out of the bond proceeds, all expenses, premiums and commissions with the authorization, sale and issuance thereof. All bonds issued under the authority of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123, except registered bonds which are registered otherwise than to bearer, and all interest coupons appurtenant thereto shall be construed to be negotiable instruments, despite the fact that they are payable solely from a specified source. The proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds may provide for the issuance, in the future, of further bonds on a parity with those initially issued.

Bonds issued hereunder shall be validated in the chancery court in which the municipality is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 3; Laws, 1985, ch. 477, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1985).

§ 49-17-107.
Securing payment of bonds.

The principal, interest and premium, if any, on any bonds shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues payable to the municipality, as the case may be, pursuant to either of the agreements specified in subsections (d) and (e) of Section 49-17-103 and may also, in the case of an agreement under subsection (e) of Section 49-17-103, be secured by a lien which may be subordinate to a prior lien on any other property given as security by the industry pursuant to the lease/sale and any bonds may be issued pursuant to and secured by a trust indenture. The proceedings under which bonds are authorized to be issued or any such trust indenture may contain any agreements and provisions customarily contained in instruments securing bonds, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, provisions respecting the fixing and collection of the sums payable by the industry to the municipality and/or the trustee, if any, as the case may be, pursuant to the lease/sale, the maintenance and insurance of the pollution control facilities, the creation and maintenance of special funds by the industry, and the rights and remedies available in the event of default to the bondholders or to the trustee under such trust indenture, all as the governing board shall deem advisable. Provided, however, that in making any such agreements or provisions no municipality shall have the power to obligate itself except with respect to any security pledged, mortgaged or otherwise made available by the industry for the securing of the bonds, and the application of the revenues from the agreement, made under either subsections (d) or (e) of Section 49-17-103 and shall not have the power to incur a pecuniary liability or a charge upon its general credit or against its taxing powers. The proceedings authorizing any bonds hereunder and any trust indenture securing such bonds may provide that in the event of default in payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds or in the performance of any agreement contained in such proceedings or trust indenture, such payment and performance may be enforced by mandamus or by the appointment of a receiver in equity with such powers as may be necessary to enforce the obligations thereof. No breach of any such agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon any municipality, or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing power.

The trustee or trustees under any trust indenture, or any depository specified by such trust indenture, may be such persons or corporations as the governing board shall designate, notwithstanding that they may be nonresidents of Mississippi or incorporated under the laws of the United States or the laws of other states of the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-108.
Refunding bonds.

Any bonds issued under authority of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123, and at any time outstanding, may, at any time and from time to time, be refunded by a municipality by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the governing board may deem necessary, but not to exceed in the aggregate the sum of (a) the principal amount of the obligations to be refunded, (b) applicable redemption premiums thereon, (c) unpaid interest on such obligations to be refunded to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds, (d) in the event the proceeds from the sale of the refunding bonds are to be deposited in trust as hereinafter provided, interest to accrue on such obligations to be refunded from the date of delivery of the refunding bonds to the date of maturity of such obligations to be refunded, or to the first redemption date of such obligations to be refunded, whichever shall be earlier, and (e) expenses, premiums and commissions deemed by the governing board to be necessary in connection with the issuance of the refunding bonds.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the obligations to be refunded shall have then matured or shall thereafter mature, either by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded thereby or by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof to the payment of the obligations to be refunded thereby, provided that the holders of any bonds so to be refunded shall not be compelled without their consent to surrender their bonds for payment or exchange prior to the date on which they are payable or, if they are called for redemption, prior to the date on which they are, by their terms, subject to redemption, and regardless of whether or not the obligations to be refunded were issued in connection with the same projects or separate projects, and regardless of whether or not the obligations to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise. Any refunding bonds issued under the authority of this section shall be payable from the revenues out of which the bonds to be refunded hereby were payable and shall be secured in accordance with the provisions of Section 49-17-107 and as authorized by this section.

The principal proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied to the payment of any expenses, premiums and commissions incurred in connection with such refunding and as follows:

To the immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded; or

Deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded, including the interest thereon, and to pay interest on the refunding bonds prior to the retirement of the obligations being refunded. Money in any such trust fund may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by, the United States of America, or obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States Government, or in certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the State of Mississippi, if such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any of said obligations having an aggregate market value equal to one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded, but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable.

Prior to the issuance of refunding bonds under this section no findings shall be required of the pollution authority under Section 49-17-111. In lieu of the petition required by Section 49-17-121, the governing board shall file with the board a petition giving a brief explanation of the proposal to refund the obligations sought to be refunded, and financial statements on the company obligated under the lease/sale. Upon the filing of the petition, the board shall, as soon as practicable, approve the issuance of such refunding bonds, unless it determines that the issuance of such bonds would not be consistent with the purposes of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123; and at any time not exceeding six (6) years following such approval the governing board may proceed with the issuance of such refunding bonds. The refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be subject to all other terms and conditions of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123, except for those provisions which, by their terms, do not apply to such refunding bonds.

It is the intent of the legislature that the terms used in this section shall have the meanings set forth in Section 49-17-101.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 420, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1977).

§ 49-17-109.
Contracts for facilities.

Contracts for acquisition, purchase, construction and/or installation of facilities contemplated by Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 shall be effected in the manner prescribed by law for public contracts; provided, however, where (a) the municipality finds and records such finding on its minutes, that because of availability or particular nature of such facilities, it would not be in the public interest or would less effectively achieve the purposes of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 to enter into such contracts upon the basis of public bidding pursuant to advertisement, (b) the industry concurs in such finding, and (c) such finding is approved by the board, public bidding pursuant to advertisement may be dispensed with and such contracts may be entered into based upon negotiation; and provided further, the industry at its option, may negotiate such contracts in the name of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-111.
Certain findings necessary preliminary to financing of facilities.

Prior to undertaking the financing of any pollution control facility, the governing board shall obtain a finding of the pollution authority that the pollution control facilities are necessary and that the design thereof will result in the elimination, mitigation and/or prevention of air or water pollution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-113.
Duties required of industries under agreements and lease/sales.

Every agreement under either subsection (d) or (e) of Section 43-17-103 shall contain a covenant obligating the industry to effect the completion of the pollution control facilities if the proceeds of the bonds, including parity completion bonds, if any, prove insufficient, and each such lease/sale shall obligate the industry to make payments which shall be sufficient (a) to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds issued for such pollution control facilities, (b) to build up and maintain any reserves deemed by the governing board to be advisable in connection therewith, and (c) to pay the costs of maintaining the pollution control facilities in good repair and the cost of keeping it properly insured. Such agreement may provide for the issuance of additional parity bonds as required in order to complete the pollution control facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-115.
Optional terms of lease/sale agreements.

Any agreement made under subsection (e) of Section 49-17-103 may provide that the pollution control facilities will be owned by the municipality, and leased to the industry; may provide the industry with an option to purchase the pollution control facility upon such terms and conditions as the governing board and the industry shall agree upon at a price which may be a nominal amount or less than the true value at the time of purchase; or may provide that the pollution control facilities shall become the property of the industry upon the acquisition thereof. Any such agreement may also, but is not required to, include a guaranty agreement whereby a corporation, foreign or domestic, other than the industry guarantees in whole or in part the obligations of the industry under the lease/sale upon such terms and conditions as the governing board may deem appropriate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-117.
Application of bond proceeds; what costs of acquisition include.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds issued under authority of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 shall be applied only for the purpose for which the bonds were issued; provided, however, that any premium and accrued interest received in any such sale shall be applied to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds sold; and provided, further, that if for any reason any portion of the proceeds shall not be needed for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, such unneeded portion of the proceeds shall be applied to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds. The cost of acquiring any pollution control facilities shall be deemed to include the following: the actual cost of the construction of any part of any pollution control facilities which may be constructed, including architect’s, engineer’s and legal fees; the purchase price of any land necessary therefor; the purchase price of any part of any pollution control facilities that may be acquired by purchase; all expenses in connection with the authorization, sale and issuance of the bonds to finance such acquisition; and the interest on the bonds for a reasonable time prior to construction, during construction, and for not exceeding one (1) year after completion of the construction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-119.
Exemption from state taxation.

The bonds authorized by Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 and the income therefrom, all trust indentures and mortgages executed as security therefor, all lease agreements made pursuant to the provisions hereof, and all pollution control facilities (when owned by the municipality) and the revenues derived from any agreement with respect thereto shall be exempt from all taxation by the State of Mississippi, and by any political subdivision thereof, except for inheritance, estate or transfer taxes and except further the contractors tax levied by Section 27-65-21, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-121.
Governing board to petition for permission to issue bonds.

No bonds shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 until the proposal of the governing board to issue the bonds shall receive the approval of the board. Whenever the governing board shall propose to issue bonds pursuant to the provisions of said sections, it shall file its petition to the board setting forth: (a) a brief description of the pollution control facilities proposed to be undertaken; (b) a statement setting forth the action taken by the pollution control authority in connection with the pollution control facilities; (c) a reasonable estimate of the cost of the pollution control facilities; (d) a general summary of the terms and conditions of the lease/sale; and (e) financial statements on lessee company. Upon the filing of the petition the board shall, as soon as practicable, make such investigation as it deems advisable, and if it finds that the proposed pollution control facilities are intended to promote the purposes of Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 and may be reasonably anticipated to effect such result, it shall be authorized to approve the pollution control facilities, and at any time not exceeding six (6) years following such approval, the governing board may proceed with the issuance of bonds for the pollution control facilities. Notice of the approval by the board shall be published at least once by the governing board in a newspaper having general circulation in the county where the pollution control facilities are to be located. The governing board shall thereupon adopt and publish as required by law a resolution declaring its intention to issue said bonds.

Any qualified elector may challenge the validity of such approval by intervention in the bond validation proceedings.

Authority hereby vested in any governing board to issue, and the board to approve, revenue bonds pursuant to and in accordance with Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 is supplemental to, and may be exercised irrespective of Sections 27-39-15, 57-1-1 to 57-1-51, 57-1-71 to 57-1-83, 57-1-101 to 57-1-107, and 57-3-1 to 57-3-33, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 49-17-123.
Construction against participation under Chapter 471, Laws of 1971, or in state pollution appropriations.

Nothing in Sections 49-17-101 through 49-17-123 shall be construed as granting authority for participation under the provisions of Chapter 471, Laws of 1971, as now or hereafter amended or participation in state appropriations for pollution control purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 505, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).